Utah statutes.
17-22-6.   Service of process on prisoners -- Penalty.

(1)  A sheriff or jailer upon whom a paper in a judicial proceeding directed to a prisoner in the sheriff's or jailer's custody is served shall forthwith deliver the paper to the prisoner, with a note thereon of the time of its service.

(2)  A sheriff or jailer who neglects to comply with Subsection (1) is liable to the prisoner for all damages occasioned by that neglect.

